Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-709
Violation; penalty.

Any person or agency who or which shall violate any of the provisions of sections 43-701 to 43-709 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor, and this penalty shall apply to officers and employees of agencies.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XI, § 7, p. 790;

C.S.1922, § 8271;

C.S.1929, § 71-2607;

R.S.1943, § 71-807;

Laws 1945, c. 170, § 9, p. 547;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 229.